Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB287.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 247.210 is amended to read as follows:
No member of the State Fair Board or any official of any department shall be an exhibitor
in competition for premium or prize money at any State Fair held while he or she is a
member of the State Fair Board or an official of any department.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/26/2026 11:11 AM Jacketed